en: Jaffa cakes, Dried sponge cake filled with fruits and covered with chocolate
fr: Génoises fourrées aux fruits et nappées de chocolat, Génoise sèche fourrée aux fruits et nappée de chocolat
hr: Jaffa kolači
pl: Delicje, Biszkopty z galaretką pokryte czekoladą

en: Sponge cake filled and covered with chocolate
fr: Génoise fourrée et nappée au chocolat

en: Soft cake filled with fruit paste and coated with sugar icing, Soft cake filled with fruit puree and coated with sugar icing
fr: Biscuit moelleux fourré à l'orange et enrobé de sucre glace

en: Chocolate soft cake
fr: Gâteau moelleux au chocolat

en: Soft cake filled with chocolate, Soft cake filled with chocolate drops, Soft cake filled with milk
fr: Gâteau moelleux fourré au chocolat, Gâteau moelleux fourré aux pépites de chocolat, Gâteau moelleux fourré au lait

en: Panforte
xx: Panforte
hr: Panforte
it: Panforte
ja: パンフォルテ

en: Marble cakes, Marble cake
de: Marmorkuchen
fr: Gâteaux marbrés, gâteau marbré
hr: Mramorni kolači
it: Torta marmorizzata
nl: Marmercakes, Marmercake

en: Muffins, muffin
xx: Muffins
de: Muffins, muffin
es: Muffins, muffin
fi: muffinit
fr: Muffins, muffin
hr: Muffins
it: Muffins, muffin
ja: マフィン
lt: Keksai, Keksiukai
nl: Muffins, Muffin
zh: 松饼

en: Frozen muffins
fr: Muffins surgelés

en: Chocolate muffins
de: Schokoladenmuffins
es: Magdalenas de chocolate
fi: suklaamuffinit
fr: Muffins au chocolat, muffin au chocolat
hr: Čokoladni muffini
it: Muffin al cioccolato
ja: チョコレートマフィン
lt: Šokoladiniai keksiukai
nl: Chocolademuffins, Chocolademuffin
zh: 巧克力松饼

en: Chocolate chip muffins
fr: Muffins aux pépites de chocolat
hr: Muffini s komadićima čokolade
it: Muffin con gocce di cioccolato
ja: チョコチップマフィン

en: Vanilla muffins
de: Vanillemuffins
fr: Muffins à la vanille
hr: Vanilin muffine
ja: バニラマフィン
lt: Vaniliniai keksiukai
nl: Vanillemuffins, Vanillemuffin
zh: 香草松饼

en: Fruit muffins
de: Muffins mit Früchten, Früchtemuffins
fi: hedelmämuffinit
fr: Muffins aux fruits
hr: Voćni muffini
lt: Vaisiniai keksiukai
nl: Fruitmuffins

en: Banana muffins
de: Bananenmuffins
fr: Muffins à la banane
hr: Muffini od banane
lt: Bananiniai keksiukai
nl: Bananenmuffins, Bananenmuffin
zh: 草莓松饼

en: Blueberry muffins
de: Heidelbeermuffins, Blaubeermuffins
fi: Mustikkamuffinit
fr: Muffins aux myrtilles, Muffins à la myrtille, Muffins aux bleuets
hr: Mafini od borovnice
lt: Mėlynių keksiukai
nl: Blauwe bessen muffins
zh: 蓝莓松饼

en: Doughnuts, Donuts
bg: Понички
de: Donuts, Donutringe
es: Berlinas
fi: Munkit, Munkkirinkelit, Munkkirinkelät, Donitsit
fr: Donuts
hr: Krafne
it: Ciambelle donut, donut
ja: ドーナツ, ドーナッツ
lt: Spurgos
nl: Donuts, Donut
pl: Pączki, Pączek
ru: Пончики

en: Plain doughnuts, Plain doughnut
fi: Täytteettömät munkit, Munkit ilman täytettä
fr: Donuts nature saupoudrés de sucre, Beignets ronds moelleux sans fourrage saupoudrés de sucre
hr: Obične krafne
lt: Paprastos spurgos

en: Doughnuts filled with fruits
fi: Hedelmämunkit, Hedelmätäytemunkit, Hedelmillä täytetyt munkit
fr: Beignet fourré aux fruits
hr: Krafne punjene voćem
lt: Spurgos su vaisių įdaru
nl: Donuts gevuld met fruit

en: Jam doughnuts, Jelly doughnuts, Doughnuts filled with jam
fi: Hillomunkit, Hillotäytemunkit, Hillolla täytetyt munkit
fr: Beignets à la confiture, Donuts à la confiture
hr: Uštipci s džemom
lt: Spurgos su džemu
nl: Donuts gevuld met jam

en: Doughnuts filled with chocolate
fi: Suklaatäytemunkit, Suklaalla täytetyt munkit
fr: Beignets fourrés au chocolat, Donuts au chocolat
hr: Krafne punjene čokoladom
lt: Spurgos su šokoladiniu įdaru, Spurgos su šokoladu
nl: Donuts gevuld met chocolade